Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1120.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3254.2. Private right of action.(a) Establishment.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a person having an interest that is or may be adversely affected may commence a civil action on the person's own behalf to compel compliance with this chapter or any rule, regulation, standard or order adopted or issued under this chapter or permit issued according to this chapter against:(1) the department, if the department fails to perform a duty under this chapter; or(2) any other person alleged to be in violation of this chapter or any rule, regulation, standard or order adopted or 123456789101112131415161718 issued under this chapter or permit issued according to this chapter.(b) Intervention.--An action under subsection (a)(2) may not be commenced by a person affected by the alleged violation if the department has commenced and is diligently prosecuting a civil action against a person for the alleged violation under subsection (a)(2) in a court of the United States or of the Commonwealth to require compliance with this chapter or any rule, regulation, standard or order adopted or issued under this chapter or permit issued according to this chapter, but in the action in a court of the United States or of the Commonwealth, a person having an interest that is or may be adversely affected may intervene as a matter of right. A person that intervenes in the action may not be required to furnish bond or other security in connection with the proceeding.(c) Jurisdiction.--Actions under this section may be filed in the appropriate court of common pleas or in Commonwealth Court, and those courts are granted jurisdiction to hear actions under this section.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) Prevent a person from exercising rights in existence for any other separate offense or remedy at law or in equity.(2) Preempt s ection 3219.1 (relating to well control emergency response).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1120PN1366 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526